Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-208.03
Insurance companies; organization; solicitors; written contract required; filing.

No person shall solicit subscriptions for the capital stock of, or applications for membership or for insurance in any corporation in the process of organization, unless he has entered into a written contract with the corporation and a certificate of his authority, signed by at least three incorporators, has been filed with the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1957, c. 178, § 4, p. 613.